Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
CHAPTER 4 Recall of Public Officers
21-4-13.
Recall election — Time for holding; officer to call election; publication of call; form of ballots; vote required to effectuate recall; special election to fill vacancy created.

Within ten days after having received certification of the sufficiency of the recall petition by the election superintendent, a recall election shall be called and published, as provided in this Code section, and shall be conducted not less than 30 days nor more than 45 days after such call; provided, however, that, if a primary or general election is to be held not less than 30 days nor more than 45 days after such call is issued, the recall election shall be conducted on that date.

A recall election shall be called:

By the Governor, if for a state officer;

By the election superintendent of the county, if for a county officer; or

By the election superintendent of the municipality, if for a municipal officer.

If a recall petition is against an officer who is directed by this Code section to call the election, it shall be called:

By the Secretary of State, if for the Governor; or

By the clerk of the superior court, if for the judge of the probate court and such judge serves as the election superintendent of the county.

The official call for such election shall be published one time as follows:

In a newspaper of general circulation in the electoral district, if such election is for a state officer;

In the official organ of the county, if such election is for a county officer; or

In the official gazette of the municipality, if such election is for a municipal officer.

It shall be the duty of the appropriate official authorized by law to conduct elections to hold and conduct the recall election and to declare and certify the results; provided, however, that if the person sought to be recalled is the official authorized by law to conduct elections, the clerk of the superior court of the county in which such recall election is to be held shall hold and conduct the recall election and declare and certify the results. The ballot for the recall election shall state the name and office of the person whose recall has been petitioned, and the ballot shall be in the form prescribed by law for state, county, or municipal officers. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the following:

Click to view

If more than one public officer is subject to a recall election in the same precinct, the election superintendent may prepare a recall ballot so as to include on a single ballot separate recall questions for each of the officers sought to be recalled.

Those persons desiring to vote in favor of recall shall vote “Yes,” and those persons desiring to vote against recall shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on such question are in favor of recall, the public office in question shall immediately become vacant. Otherwise, the public official named in the recall petition shall continue in office.

A special election shall be called by the appropriate state or local official to fill a vacancy created by recall. The special election shall be called within ten days after the date of the recall election and shall be conducted at least 30 days but not more than 45 days following the call. If no official is specifically designated by law or if the appropriate official has been recalled, the Governor shall issue the call for a special election to fill the vacancy created by recall. Any person who has been recalled from office under this chapter shall be eligible to offer for election to fill the vacancy created by recall.

‘‘[ ] YES Shall (name of officeholder), (name of office), be recalled and removed from public office on the [ ] NO
grounds that said official has, while holding public office, conducted himself or herself in a manner which relates to and adversely affects the administration of his or her office and adversely affects the rights and interests of the public and on the ground(s) that such official (State the appropriate ground or grounds for recall as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of Code Section 21-4-3.)?”

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1.

Cross references.

Filling of vacancies in public offices generally, T. 45, C. 5 and § 45-12-50 et seq.

21-4-14.
Recall election — Filing subsequent recall petition against officer following recall election or denial of recall petition.

After a recall petition and election, no further recall petition shall be filed against the same officer until at least six months have elapsed from the date of the previous recall election; and any other recall petitions against that officer outstanding on the date of the recall election shall be void.

If the election superintendent finds that a recall petition is insufficient and fails to verify the same, no further application for a recall petition shall be filed against the same officer until at least six months have elapsed from the date of the denial of such recall petition; provided, however, that such finding of insufficiency shall not bar the verification of any other recall petition against that officer which is available for signature or pending verification at the time of such finding of insufficiency.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

21-4-15.
Manner of conducting recall elections.

The powers, duties, and penalties conferred or imposed by law upon public officials who conduct special elections are conferred and imposed upon public officials conducting recall elections. All such elections shall be conducted in the same manner as special elections and in accordance with Chapters 2 and 3 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

21-4-16.
Campaign and financial disclosure requirements, restrictions, and qualifications.

Any person sponsoring or opposing a recall petition under this chapter shall be subject to Chapter 5 of this title, the “Ethics in Government Act,” in the same manner as candidates; and the petition chairperson shall file the reports required to be filed under said chapter and shall be subject to the same restrictions, qualifications, and provisions contained in such chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

21-4-17.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

21-4-18.
Application to court to compel election superintendent to comply with chapter; jurisdiction and venue of actions against election superintendent.

If the election superintendent fails to comply with this chapter, any elector may apply, within ten days after such refusal, to the superior court for a writ of mandamus to compel the election superintendent to perform his or her official duties. If the court finds that the election superintendent has not complied with this chapter, the court shall issue an order for the election superintendent to comply.

An action against an election superintendent shall be filed in the superior court of the county of such election superintendent, except that an action against the Secretary of State shall be filed in the Superior Court of Fulton County.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

21-4-19.
Determination of eligibility to sign application for recall petition or petition for recall.

An elector’s eligibility to sign an application for a recall petition or a petition for recall shall be determined as of the date immediately preceding the date the application or petition is signed by that elector.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

21-4-20.
Giving or receiving money or other thing of value to sign petition or affidavit; compelling person to sign petition or to remove name; signing another’s name to petition; signing more than one; signing by ineligible person.

Any person who gives or receives money or any other thing of value for signing a recall application or petition or for signing an affidavit of signature withdrawal shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A person who, by menace or threat either directly or indirectly, induces or compels or attempts to induce or compel any other person to sign or subscribe or to refrain from signing or subscribing that person’s name to a recall application or petition or, after signing or subscribing that person’s name, to have that person’s name taken therefrom shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

A person who signs any name other than his or her own to a recall application or petition, except in a circumstance where he or she signs for a person in the presence of and at the specific request of such person who is incapable of signing that person’s own name, or who knowingly signs his or her name more than once for the same recall application or petition or who knowingly is not at the time of signing a qualified elector of the electoral district of the officer sought to be recalled shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.

21-4-21.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter is supplementary to any other methods provided by general law for removing a public official from office; and nothing in this chapter shall be construed as abridging or repealing such laws.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-4-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1721, § 1.